Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2823
Facsimile, defined.

Facsimile means a copy generated by a system that encodes a document or photograph into electrical signals, transmits those signals over telecommunications lines, and reconstructs the signals to create an exact duplicate of the original document at the receiving end.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 919.